Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-114
Mayor; territorial jurisdiction.

The mayor in any city of the second class shall have such jurisdiction as may be vested in him or her by ordinance, over all places within five miles of the corporate limits of the city, for the enforcement of any health or quarantine ordinance and regulation thereof, and shall have jurisdiction in all matters vested in him or her by ordinance, excepting taxation, within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such city.

Laws 1879, § 15, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5006;

C.S.1922, § 4175;

C.S.1929, § 17-114;

R.S.1943, § 17-114;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 12.

While it is not determined whether mayor and city council under this section may or may not regulate slaughterhouses outside the city limits, they cannot give vitality and force to such a regulation passed by the board of health in such matter. State v. Temple, 99 Neb. 505, 156 N.W. 1063 (1916).